District of Columbia statutes.
25-804

Notifications from DCRA, Fire Department, and Metropolitan Police Department.

(a)

In accordance with procedures that the Mayor shall establish, the Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs and the Fire Department shall promptly notify the Board if a licensed establishment is the subject of a citation or other enforcement action for a violation of laws or regulations enforced by these departments.

(b)

If a licensed establishment is the subject of an incident report by the Metropolitan Police Department, the Metropolitan Police Department shall file a copy of the incident report with the Board. The Board shall make the report available for public inspection upon request.

Jan. 24, 1934, 48 Stat. 330, ch. 4, § 17
Aug. 27, 1935, 49 Stat. 900, ch. 756, § 9
Aug. 25, 1937, 50 Stat. 803, ch. 766, § 3
Apr. 26, 1950, 64 Stat. 88, ch. 106
Dec. 8, 1970, 84 Stat. 1393, Pub. L. 91-535, § 3(a)
Sept. 29, 1982, D.C. Law 4-157, §§ 9, 15, 29 DCR 3617
Mar. 8, 1984, D.C. Law 5-51, § 2(b)(5), 30 DCR 5927
Mar. 7, 1987, D.C. Law 6-217, § 11, 34 DCR 907
Sept. 11, 1993, D.C. Law 10-12, § 2(b), 40 DCR 4020
May 24, 1994, D.C. Law 10-122, § 2(h), 41 DCR 1658
Apr. 30, 1998, D.C. Law 12-97, § 2, 45 DCR 1517
May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959
1981 Ed., § 25-804.
1973 Ed., § 25-118.